District of Columbia statutes.
8-1313

Dust suppression and road treatment.

The use of waste, used oil, or other material, which is contaminated or mixed with dioxin or any other hazardous waste for dust suppression or road treatment in the District of Columbia, is prohibited.

History

Mar. 16, 1978, D.C. Law 2-64, § 15
as added Oct. 18, 1989, D.C. Law 8-37, § 2(g), 36 DCR 5748

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 6-713.